sk-SK: Typ konektora oplotenia: 2-kolíkový; 3-kolíkový; 3-zubový; Bajonetový; Bezdrôtový; Iný
sv: Typ av stängselanslutning: 2-stifts; 3-stifts; 3-polig; Bajonett; Trådlös; Övrigt
bg-BG: Тип конектор за фехтовка: 2-пинов; 3-пинов; 3-щифтов; Байонет; Безжичен; Друго
nl: Schermen connector type: 2-pins; 3-pins; 3-polig; Bajonet; Draadloos; Overig
lt-LT: Fechtavimo jungties tipas: 2 kontaktų; 3 kontaktų; 3 šakutės kontaktų; Bajonetinis; Belaidis; Kitas
hu: Kerítéscsatlakozó típusa: 2-tűs; 3-tűs; 3-ágú; Bajonett; Vezeték nélküli; Egyéb
th: ประเภทตัวเชื่อมต่อรั้ว: 2 พิน; 3 พิน; 3 ง่าม; เขี้ยวล็อก; ไร้สาย; อื่นๆ
tr: Eskrim bağlantı tipi: 2 pimli; 3 pimli; 3 tırnaklı; Süngü; Kablosuz; Diğer
nb: Gjerdekoblingstype: 2-pinners; 3-pinners; 3-polet; Bajonett; Trådløs; Annet
ko: 펜싱 커넥터 유형: 2핀; 3핀; 3프롱; 바요넷; 무선; 기타
cs: Typ konektoru fleretové šňůry: 2kolíkové; 3kolíkové; 3kolíkové; Bajonetové; Bezdrátové; Jiné
pt-BR: Tipo de conector de cerca: 2 pinos; 3 pinos; 3 pontas; Baioneta; Sem fio; Outro
en: Fencing connector type: 2-pin; 3-pin; 3-prong; Bayonet; Wireless; Other
ja: フェンスコネクタータイプ: 2ピン; 3ピン; 3プロング; バヨネット; ワイヤレス; その他
vi: Loại đầu nối đấu kiếm: 2 chân; 3 chân; 3 ngạnh; Đầu cắm Bayonet; Không dây; Khác
de: Typ des Fechtverbinders: 2-polig; 3-polig; 3-Zinken; Bajonett; Kabellos; Sonstige
ru: Тип фехтовального разъема: 2-контактный; 3-контактный; 3-штырьковый; Байонетный; Беспроводной; Другое
zh-TW: 擊劍連接器類型: 2 針; 3 針; 3 爪; 卡口式; 無線; 其他
da: Type af hegntilslutning: 2-polet; 3-polet; 3-polet; Bajonet; Trådløs; Andet
es: Tipo de conector de cercado: 2 pines; 3 pines; 3 puntas; Bayoneta; Inalámbrico; Otro
pt-PT: Tipo de conector de vedação: 2 pinos; 3 pinos; 3 pontas; Baioneta; Sem fios; Outro
it: Tipo di connettore per recinzione: A 2 pin; A 3 pin; A 3 poli; A baionetta; Senza fili; Altro
ro-RO: Tipul conectorului pentru gard: 2 pini; 3 pini; 3 pini; Baionetă; Fără fir; Altele
zh-CN: 击剑接器类型: 2 针; 3 针; 3 插脚; 卡口; 无线; 其他
hr-HR: Vrsta konektora za ogradu: 2-pinski; 3-pinski; S 3 zupca; Bajunet; Bežično; Ostalo
fr: Type de connecteur d’escrime: À 2 broches; À 3 broches; À 3 fiches; Baïonnette; Sans fil; Autre
el: Τύπος συνδέσμου περίφραξης: 2 ακίδων; 3 ακίδων; 3 προεξοχών; Μπαγιονέτ; Ασύρματο; Άλλο
fi: Miekkailuvarusteen liitintyyppi: 2-nastainen; 3-nastainen; 3-piikkinen; Bajonetti; Langaton; Muu
sl-SI: Ograja tipa povezovalnik: 2-pinski; 3-pinski; 3-rogljati; Bajonet; Brezžično; Drugo
pl: Typ konektora ogrodzeniowego: 2-pinowe; 3-pinowe; 3-bolcowe; Bagnetowe; Bezprzewodowe; Inne